Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Department  of Corrections, for the biennium
beginning July 1,  2023, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the following
purposes:
(1) Operations and health
services .................................  $ 1,453,194,979
(2) Central administration
and administrative
services .................................  $ 219,342,756
(3) Correctional services ............  $ 86,249,733
(4) Community corrections ........  $ 277,406,303
(5) Debt service ..........................  $ 101,514,230
(6) Capital improvements ...........  $ 3,186,299
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Department of Cor-
rections, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations and health
services ................................. $ 39,498,592
(2) Central administration
and administrative
services ................................. $ 24,012,466
(3) Correctional services ............ $ 2,761,625
(4) Community corrections ........ $ 6,859,278
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $300,000
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Department of Corrections.
SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$16,874,296 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Department of Corrections from American  Rescue Plan Act
Enrolled Senate Bill 5504 (SB 5504-A) Page 1
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the Department of Corrections.
SECTION 5. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by Senate June 16, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5504 (SB 5504-A) Page 2